analyzer/orimorph.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+1 +2 +3
+Sg +Pl
+Hon +Infr
+Anim +Inanim
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Instr +Loc +Abl
+Def +Indef
@U.ANIM.HUMAN@ @U.ANIM.NONHUMAN@
^GUESSNOUNSTEM

LEXICON Root
0:0 Stem;

LEXICON Animacy
@U.ANIM.HUMAN@ AnimNumber;
@U.ANIM.NONHUMAN@ InanimNumber;

LEXICON AnimNumber
+Sg:0 Honorific;
+Pl:ମାନେ #;
+Pl:ମାନ Honorific;

LEXICON InanimNumber
+Sg:0 Honorific;
+Pl:ଗୁଡିକ Honorific;
+Pl:ଗୁଡ଼ିକ Honorific;
+Pl+Acc:ଗୁଡିକୁ Definiteness;
+Pl+Acc:ଗୁଡ଼ିକୁ Definiteness;

LEXICON Honorific
+Hon:ଙ୍କ୍ Case;
+Hon:ଙ୍କ Case;
Case;

LEXICON Case
@U.ANIM.HUMAN@ AnimCase;
@U.ANIM.NONHUMAN@ InanimCase;

LEXICON AnimCase
+Nom:0 Definiteness;
+Acc:କୁ Definiteness;
+Hon+Acc:ଙ୍କୁ Definiteness;
+Gen:ର Definiteness;
+Instr:ରେ Definiteness;
+Loc:ରେ Definiteness;
+Abl:ରୁ Definiteness;

LEXICON InanimCase
+Nom:0 Definiteness;
+Instr:ଦ୍ୱର Definiteness;
+Loc:ଠାରେ Definiteness;
+Abl:ଠାରୁ Definiteness;

LEXICON Definiteness
@U.ANIM.HUMAN@ AnimDefiniteness;
@U.ANIM.NONHUMAN@ InanimDefiniteness;
#;

LEXICON AnimDefiniteness
+Def:କ Punctuation;

LEXICON InanimDefiniteness
+Def:ଟି Punctuation;
+Def:ଟା Punctuation;
+Indef:ଟେ Punctuation;
+Indef:ଟିଏ Punctuation;
+Indef:ଟାଏ Punctuation;

LEXICON Punctuation
#;

LEXICON Stem
ଓଲଟିଯିବା Animacy;
ସ୍ୱୀକୃତି Animacy;
ସଂଚୟ Animacy;
କର୍ତ୍ତୃବାଚ୍ୟ Animacy;
ଲାଖିରହିବା Animacy;
କୈଶ୍ୱର୍ଯ୍ୟ Animacy;
ଉପଦେଷ୍ଟା Animacy;
ଆଫ୍ରିକାବାସୀ Animacy;
କୄଷି Animacy;
ବାୟୁ-ଗର୍ତ୍ତ Animacy;
କିମିଆଁକାରୀ Animacy;
ଆଲମିରା Animacy;
ମିଶ୍ରଣ Animacy;
ଅମ୍ଳ Animacy;
ତାବିଜ Animacy;
ଅଭିଶାପ Animacy;
ବୈରଭାବ Animacy;
ଅନିୟମିତତା Animacy;
ବିମାନଭେଦୀ Animacy;
ଉତ୍କଣ୍ଠା Animacy;
କ୍ଷୁଧାବର୍ଧକ Animacy;
ମଂଜୁରି Animacy;
ପ୍ରଧାନ Animacy;
ଯୁକ୍ତିତର୍କ Animacy;
ଅଭିମାନ Animacy;
ନର୍ତକ Animacy;
କଟୁତା Animacy;
ପରିଶ୍ରମ Animacy;
ପ୍ରାୟଶ୍ଚିତ Animacy;
ଘୃଣା Animacy;
ପୃଷ୍ଠପଟ Animacy;
ନୃତ୍ୟନାଟିକା Animacy;
ବ୍ୟାରୋମିଟର Animacy;
ବଜାର Animacy;
ବିଶ୍ୱାସ Animacy;
କଟୁରୀ Animacy;
ଜାମୁକୋଳି Animacy;
ବ୍ଲାଉଜ୍ Animacy;
ଛାତ୍ରାବାସ Animacy;
ମୂର୍ଖ Animacy;
ରସା Animacy;
ବ୍ରାହ୍ମଣ Animacy;
ଇଟାଗୁଣ୍ଡ Animacy;
କର୍କଶତା Animacy;
ନଗରଜନ Animacy;
ସିନ୍ଦୂକ Animacy;
କର୍ପୂର Animacy;
ମୋଟରଗାଡ଼ି Animacy;
ଶଗଡିଆ Animacy;
ବର୍ଗ Animacy;
ବିଛା Animacy;
ଅଧ୍ୟାୟ Animacy;
ସତରଂଜ Animacy;
ଚାଇନା Animacy;
ଚୁରୁଟ Animacy;
ଗଡ଼ Animacy;
ସହପାଠୀ Animacy;
ଡୋଲି Animacy;
ଈଶ୍ୱରଜଟା Animacy;
ସଂସଂଜନ Animacy;
ମହାବିଦ୍ୟାଳୟ Animacy;
ରହସ୍ୟାଭିନେତା Animacy;
ସମିତି Animacy;
ସଂଗ୍ରହ Animacy;
ସଂକଳ୍ପନା Animacy;
ସମ୍ମେଲନ Animacy;
ଗୁଣଜ୍ଞ Animacy;
କନେଷ୍ଟବଳ Animacy;
ପାତ୍ର Animacy;
ଅନିଷ୍ଟ Animacy;
ସଂଭାଷଣ Animacy;
ସହ-ଚାଳକ Animacy;
ମହାପାଳିକା Animacy;
ସଭାସଦ Animacy;
ସାହସ Animacy;
ଦସ୍ତକାର Animacy;
ଲତା Animacy;
ଓରା Animacy;
ସୁସ୍ପଷ୍ଟ Animacy;
ପିଆଲାଭରା Animacy;
ବକ୍ରଭାବ Animacy;
ବିଲହଂସ Animacy;
ଦେହରକାତି Animacy;
ବଧିରତା Animacy;
ଛଳ Animacy;
ଅପଘଟନ Animacy;
ପରାଜୟବାଦ Animacy;
ନିପୁଣତା Animacy;
ସୁରକ୍ଷା Animacy;
ପିଶାଚ Animacy;
ଘନତ୍ୱ Animacy;
ପ୍ରତିନିଯୁକ୍ତ Animacy;
ଡେସ୍କ Animacy;
ଅବାଂଛିତ Animacy;
ଶବ୍ଦକୋଷ Animacy;
ପ୍ରଯତ୍ନ Animacy;
ଅସମ୍ମତି Animacy;
ଚର୍ଚା Animacy;
ମତଭେଦ Animacy;
ବୁଡ଼ାଳି Animacy;
ଡୁବି Animacy;
ଦାନ Animacy;
କଙ୍କି Animacy;
ଅଳ୍ପମାତ୍ରା Animacy;
ପାତିହଂସଛୁଆ Animacy;
ସ୍ଥାୟିତ୍ୱ Animacy;
ବିଆଳିଧାନ Animacy;
ଅର୍ଥଶାସ୍ତ୍ରବିତ୍ Animacy;
ପଞ୍ଚାଅଶୀ Animacy;
ବିଦ୍ୟୁତଦ୍ୱାର Animacy;
ବାଗ୍ମୀତା Animacy;
ବ୍ୟବସ୍ଥାପନ Animacy;
ଉତ୍ସାହ Animacy;
ଗୋଜହ୍ୱିକା Animacy;
ଅଶ୍ୱପାଳକ Animacy;
ଅଶୁଦ୍ଧି Animacy;
ଇତ୍ୟାଦି Animacy;
ପୂର୍ବସନ୍ଧ୍ୟା Animacy;
ହଲଚଲ Animacy;
ଯୋଗ୍ୟତା Animacy;
ନାଶ Animacy;
କାରଖାନା Animacy;
ପରିଚୟ Animacy;
ପଶୁ Animacy;
ପାଦ Animacy;
ଉର୍ବରତା Animacy;
ପିଶାଚ Animacy;
ରୁମ Animacy;
ଚୁଲୀ Animacy;
ସମାଲୋଚନା Animacy;
ବନସ୍ପତି Animacy;
ଫାଈଲ Animacy;
ଫୁଟବଲ Animacy;
ଅଗ୍ରଦୂତ Animacy;
ଗଣକ Animacy;
ଫୁଆରା Animacy;
ଭାଇଚାରା Animacy;
ଶୁକ୍ରବାର Animacy;
ମିତବ୍ୟୟୀ Animacy;
ପଶୁଲୋମ Animacy;
ପିତ୍ତାଶୟ Animacy;
ଲହସୁନ Animacy;
ବଂଶାବଳୀ Animacy;
ଭୂତତ୍ତ୍ୱବିଦ୍ Animacy;
ଗାଲିଶି Animacy;
ଗ୍ରନ୍ଥି Animacy;
ଦିଅଁ Animacy;
ଲାଉ Animacy;
ଜେଜେମାଆ Animacy;
ପଣଆଈ Animacy;
ମନୋମାଳିନ୍ୟ Animacy;
ଅତିଥି Animacy;
ନିବାସୀ Animacy;
ମତିଭ୍ରମ Animacy;
ସୁଂଦରତା Animacy;
ସାହସରେ Animacy;
ନିର୍ଦୟତା Animacy;
ସେ Animacy;
ସ୍ୱାସ୍ଥ୍ୟକେନ୍ଦ୍ର Animacy;
ସ୍ୱର୍ଗ Animacy;
ଶିରସ୍ତ୍ରାଣ Animacy;
ମହାରାନୀ Animacy;
ଷଟ୍ପଦୀ Animacy;
ଦସ୍ୟୁ Animacy;
ଐତିହାସିକ Animacy;
ପୋପ Animacy;
ସଜାତୀୟତା Animacy;
ଭୟଂକରତାରୁ Animacy;
ହୋଟେଲ୍ Animacy;
ଅଶ୍ୱଶକ୍ତି[ଇଂଜନର] Animacy;
ଶିକାରୀ Animacy;
ପରିଚୟ Animacy;
ଯଦି Animacy;
ଆକୃତି Animacy;
ସାମ୍ରାଜ୍ୟବାଦ Animacy;
ସଂଚାଳକ Animacy;
ଆରୋପଣ Animacy;
ଜାଦୁ-ଟୋନା Animacy;
ସମାବେଶନ Animacy;
ଅଶୁଦ୍ଧତା Animacy;
କ୍ଷତିପୂରଣ Animacy;
ରୋଷ Animacy;
ସନ୍ତୋଷ Animacy;
ବଦନାମୀ Animacy;
ସାମନାରେ Animacy;
ଅନ୍ୟାୟ Animacy;
ଗର୍ଭାଧାନ Animacy;
କିସ୍ତି Animacy;
ବିଦ୍ରୋହ Animacy;
ହସ୍ତକ୍ଷେପ Animacy;
ଫାଟ Animacy;
ନଶା Animacy;
ଓଲଟା Animacy;
ଲୌହଶାଳା Animacy;
ଇଟାଲୀ Animacy;
ବର୍ଛା Animacy;
କାଠ Animacy;
ପରିସ୍ଥିତି Animacy;
ଆତ୍ମଘାତୀ Animacy;
କେଟିଲି Animacy;
କିଲୋୱାଟ Animacy;
ପରିଚିତ Animacy;
କଜଳ Animacy;
ଅଳ୍ପତା Animacy;
ଦୀପକ Animacy;
ଡୋରି Animacy;
ଜାଲି Animacy;
ନେତା Animacy;
କିମ୍ବଦନ୍ତୀ Animacy;
ଚିତାବାଘ Animacy;
ନକଲି Animacy;
ବଦଳରେ Animacy;
ତଡିତ Animacy;
ଭାଷା-ବିଜ୍ଞାନ Animacy;
ଯାଷ୍ଟିମଧୁ Animacy;
ଝିଟିପିଟି Animacy;
କାଠକଟାଳି Animacy;
ବିଧି Animacy;
ଲୋରୀ Animacy;
ଶ୍ରୀମତୀ Animacy;
ମହତ୍ତ୍ୱ Animacy;
ପାସଂଗ Animacy;
ମା Animacy;
ପାଗଳାମୀ Animacy;
ବନ୍ଧୁକଧାରୀ Animacy;
ନାଟକ Animacy;
ଜଟା Animacy;
ମାପ Animacy;
ଝିଲ୍ଲୀ Animacy;
ଦୟା Animacy;
ଉପାୟ Animacy;
ମଧ୍ୟରାତ୍ରୀ Animacy;
ଗଉଡୁଣୀ Animacy;
ଚାଟୁକାର Animacy;
ଗର୍ଭପାତ Animacy;
ଅମରବେଲ Animacy;
ସଂକୋଚ Animacy;
ମା Animacy;
ଏକାମ୍ଳକ Animacy;
ନିଶାନ୍ଧ Animacy;
ମର୍ତ୍ୟତା Animacy;
ମଶା Animacy;
ଚଳଚିତ୍ର Animacy;
ମୁଖିକା Animacy;
କଇଁଛ Animacy;
ବହ୍ୱକ୍ଷର Animacy;
ସଂଗୀତଶାଳା Animacy;
ମେଣ୍ଢାମାଂସ Animacy;
ଖଣତି Animacy;
ଅନିବାର୍ଯ୍ୟତା Animacy;
ଡର Animacy;
ଗୋବରା Animacy;
ଚୁଚୁକ Animacy;
ଅନୁପସ୍ଥିତି Animacy;
ଅବିରାମ Animacy;
ଅନବସ୍ଥା Animacy;
ନିଷ୍ପ୍ରଭାବତା Animacy;
ଦଲିଆ Animacy;
ପ୍ରେକ୍ଷକ Animacy;
ଅଧିବାସୀ Animacy;
କାର୍ଯ୍ୟାଳୟ Animacy;
ଜାହାଜରେ Animacy;
ଖୋଲାପଣ Animacy;
ଦେବବାଣୀ Animacy;
ମୂଳ Animacy;
ନିଜର Animacy;
ପର Animacy;
ମାଲିକ Animacy;
ଚିତିସାପ Animacy;
କବଚ Animacy;
ଏକାଧିପତି Animacy;
ବରାବରୀ Animacy;
ଆମୋଦପ୍ରମୋଦ Animacy;
ଶାସ୍ତି Animacy;
ଚପରାସୀ Animacy;
ଅତରବିକ୍ରେତା Animacy;
ନିରନ୍ତରତା Animacy;
ଅନୁନୟ Animacy;
ଚିଡିଚିଡାପଣ Animacy;
ଜନହିତୈଷୀ Animacy;
ଚିତ୍ର Animacy;
ବର୍ଣକତା Animacy;
କନିଷ୍ଟିକା Animacy;
ଘଡା Animacy;
ବିଂବାଣୁ Animacy;
ନାଟକକାର Animacy;
ମଂଚ Animacy;
ଭୂତ Animacy;
ଧର୍ମାଧ୍ୟକ୍ଷ Animacy;
ଝିଙ୍କ Animacy;
ପର୍ତ୍ତୁଗାଲ୍ Animacy;
ଛାପ Animacy;
ବାସନ Animacy;
ପାତନ Animacy;
ବ୍ୟାବସାୟିକ Animacy;
ଅଧ୍ୟକ୍ଷତା Animacy;
ପ୍ରଧାନମନ୍ତ୍ରୀ Animacy;
ଅଭାବ Animacy;
ଉତ୍ପାଦ Animacy;
ଭବିଷ୍ୟବାଣୀ Animacy;
ଶୂଳ Animacy;
ସ୍ୱାମୀ Animacy;
ରକ୍ଷକ Animacy;
ପ୍ରତିବନ୍ଧ Animacy;
ମନୋବିଶ୍ଲେଷଣ Animacy;
ଲୋକହିତଭାବ Animacy;
ଲଢେଇ Animacy;
ଅନୁସରଣ Animacy;
ଯୋଗ୍ୟତା Animacy;
ଜଲ୍‌ଦି Animacy;
ବିକିରଣ-ଚିକିତ୍ସକ Animacy;
ଧୁର୍ମୁସ Animacy;
ଦରଗଣନାକାରୀ Animacy;
ସ୍ମୃତି Animacy;
ଭୟଂକର Animacy;
ନିୟମାନୁକୂଳତା Animacy;
ସହାୟତା{କୋଷ} Animacy;
ନାମ Animacy;
ସରିସୃପ Animacy;
ପଦତ୍ୟାଗ Animacy;
ଜୀର୍ଣୋଦ୍ଧାର Animacy;
ପୁନର୍ଯୋଗ Animacy;
ତାଳ Animacy;
ଦକ୍ଷିଣପନ୍ଥୀ Animacy;
ଡକେଇତୀ Animacy;
ଗୋଲାପଜଳ Animacy;
ଚକ୍ରବାକ Animacy;
ବୋଡାସାପ Animacy;
ଗାଢପୀତ Animacy;
ବିକ୍ରେତ୍ରୀ Animacy;
ପୁଣ୍ୟସ୍ଥାନ Animacy;
ମଦ୍ୟ Animacy;
କମରବନ୍ଧ Animacy;
କରତଗୁଣ୍ଡ Animacy;
ଘଟନାସ୍ଥଳ Animacy;
ବଂଶଜ Animacy;
ଧର୍ମଗ୍ରନ୍ଥ Animacy;
ନୌସେନା Animacy;
ଗୁପ୍ତତା Animacy;
ଗମ୍ଭୀରତା Animacy;
ପୃଥକ୍କରଣ Animacy;
ଅର୍ଧ-ବୃତ୍ତ Animacy;
ଭାବୁକତା Animacy;
ସର୍ବତ Animacy;
ସାଲିସ Animacy;
କମ୍ପନକାରୀ Animacy;
ଭେଡା Animacy;
କାମଚୋର Animacy;
ଅଳ୍ପାୟୁ Animacy;
ରୋଗ-ଭତ୍ତା Animacy;
ଅର୍ଥ Animacy;
ଏକୁଟିଆ Animacy;
ପଞ୍ଚଷଠି Animacy;
ପ୍ରହସନ Animacy;
କୌଶଳ Animacy;
ଅନାବଶ୍ୟକ Animacy;
ହିମକ୍ଷେତ୍ର Animacy;
ଲୁଣ Animacy;
ପୁଅ Animacy;
ସ୍ପେନ୍ Animacy;
ଚଷମା Animacy;
ମେରୁଦଣ୍ଡ Animacy;
ପ୍ରାୟୋଜକ Animacy;
ସନ୍ଥ Animacy;
ସହନଶକ୍ତି Animacy;
ପରିସ୍ଥିତି Animacy;
ତତ୍ତ୍ୱାବଧାନ Animacy;
ମଂଜିଲ Animacy;
ରେଖା Animacy;
ଅବଚେତନ Animacy;
ହ୍ରାସ Animacy;
ଡାଳୁଅଧାନ Animacy;
ଅରୁଆଚାଉଳ Animacy;
ଅନୁମାନ Animacy;
ସୁଇଟର୍ Animacy;
ଦଗାଦିଆ Animacy;
ସହାନୁଭୂତି Animacy;
ତବଲା Animacy;
ସ୍ପର୍ଶରେଖା Animacy;
ତରାଟ Animacy;
ପ୍ରବୃତ୍ତି Animacy;
ଆତଂକବାଦ Animacy;
ତୁମକୁ Animacy;
ଖୋଲାଜାଗା Animacy;
ଚିନ୍ତକ Animacy;
ତୁ Animacy;
ବାଘୁଣୀ Animacy;
ବେଙ୍ଗ Animacy;
ଭର୍ତ୍ସନା Animacy;
ପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣତା Animacy;
କ୍ଷେତ୍ର Animacy;
ଅନ୍ତର୍ଜ୍ଞାନବାଦ Animacy;
ବହନୀୟତା Animacy;
ସଂଧି Animacy;
ଶ୍ରଦ୍ଧାଂଜଳୀ Animacy;
ବାଳିଆ Animacy;
ଲୋଟଣୀପାରା Animacy;
ଅଣତିରିଶି Animacy;
ଅନାବଶ୍ୟକ Animacy;
ଶାନ୍ତି Animacy;
ଅବାସ୍ତବିକତା Animacy;
ଅନିଚ୍ଛା Animacy;
ସୁରେଇ Animacy;
ଟୀକା Animacy;
ବିବିଧତା Animacy;
ଘଟନାସ୍ଥଳ Animacy;
ପୋଲ Animacy;
ଜାଗରଣ Animacy;
ବେହେଲା Animacy;
ଶବ୍ଦାବଳୀ Animacy;
ଅଶିଷ୍ଟତା Animacy;
ଉଷ୍ଣତା Animacy;
ତରଭୁଜ Animacy;
ବୁଧବାର Animacy;
ସୁଯୋଗ୍ୟ Animacy;
କ’ଣ Animacy;
ଭାକୁର Animacy;
କଟାସ Animacy;
ଶୋକ Animacy;
ମଜୁରିଆବର୍ଗ Animacy;
ବର୍ଷ Animacy;
ଆପଣଙ୍କର Animacy;
